Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-641
Application; hearing, when.

The Chief Water Officer may hold a hearing on an application filed under section 46-639 on the Chief Water Officer's own motion and shall hold a hearing on such an application if requested by any person pursuant to section 46-640.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 4, p. 830;

Laws 1987, LB 140, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 180;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 181.